Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5123
United States Government and government-guaranteed obligations.

An insurer may invest in direct obligations of the United States or obligations for which the full faith and credit of the United States is pledged for the payment of all principal and interest.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 23.